apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="zorganiz/ovať__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ovať</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ujem</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uješ</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uje</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ujeme</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ujete</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ujú</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oval</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovala</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovalo</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovali</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uj</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ujme</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ujte</l>
          <r>ovať<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="je/sť__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>sť</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>š</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dia</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dol</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dla</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dlo</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dli</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dz</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzme</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzte</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="BASE__bytie"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zje/sť__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>sť</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>š</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dia</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dol</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dla</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dlo</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dli</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dz</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzme</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzte</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r>sť<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
       </p>
       <par n="BASE__bytie"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="zjesť"><par n="ne+"/><i>zje</i><par n="zje/sť__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zorganizovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>zorganiz</i><par n="zorganiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="absorbovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>absorb</i><par n="zorganiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aberovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>aber</i><par n="zorganiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vybudovať"><par n="ne+"/><i>vybud</i><par n="zorganiz/ovať__vblex"/></e>
